Florida, session 2026, HB1025.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1000.09, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
1000.09 Notification of sexual violence policies and
supportive measure in K-20 education.—
(1) For purposes of this section, the term:
(a) "Child advocacy center" means a center that
coordinates the investigation, treatment, and prosecution of
child abuse cases by using multidisciplinary teams of
professionals involved in child protective and victim advocacy
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1025-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1025 2026
services, law enforcement and prosecution, and physical and
mental health services.
(b) "Frequently encountered language" means a language
that is the primary language spoken by:
1. At least 5 percent of the overall student population or
employee population of the school;
2. At least 5 percent of the population of the county in
which the school is located; or
3. At least 1,000 people in the county in which the school
is located.
(c) "School" means a public K-12 school, a public
postsecondary educational institution, a private K-12 school, or
a private postsecondary educational institution.
(d) "Sexual assault service provider" means an agency that
provides victim advocacy and support services to survivors of
sexual violence.
(e) "Sexual violence policies" means any policy,
procedure, protocol, guideline, or rule regarding sexual
assault, sexual abuse, domestic violence, dating violence, and
stalking that occurs on school premises, on school
transportation, or at a school-sponsored, off-campus event and
where a student, school staff member, or school volunteer is the
purported victim or offender of such offense.
(f) "Supportive measures" means individualized measures
related to sexual assault, sexual abuse, domestic violence,
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1025-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1025 2026
dating violence, or stalking that are nondisciplinary or
nonpunitive measures that are offered to a student, school staff
member, or school volunteer to protect the safety of all
parties, provide reasonable accommodations, and support
educational success.
(2)(a) Each school must have sexual violence policies.
Such policies must:
1. Be written in clear, plain language in a color, size,
and font that enhances readability.
2. Be available in frequently encountered languages to
ensure timely and meaningful access for students, parents,
school staff, and school volunteers with limited English
proficiency. Processes should be in place for access to the
material in less frequently encountered languages.
3. Include, but are not limited to, all of the following:
a. Options for a student to report an incident of sexual
assault, sexual abuse, domestic violence, dating violence, or
stalking to the school or law enforcement.
b. The rights of victims and offenders during any
investigation or disciplinary proceeding conducted by the
school.
c. The process the school will use for an investigation or
disciplinary proceeding, including any rights to an appeal.
d. Whether the school has an affirmative duty to report to
law enforcement when a report of sexual assault, sexual abuse,
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1025-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1025 2026
domestic violence, dating violence, or stalking is made to the
school.
(b) Each school may have supportive measures. Such
measures may include, but are not limited to, all of the
following:
1. Where available, the name, title, e-mail, address, and
telephone number of the person designated by the school to
receive reports of violations of the sexual violence policies
and provide information regarding such policies and supportive
measures.
2. Where available, the name, telephone number, and
website address for a local, state, or national hotline that
provides information to victims of sexual assault or sexual
abuse.
3. Where available, the name, telephone number, and
website address of the nearest child advocacy center and sexual
assault service provider.
4. Access to counseling, health care, and mental health
care.
5. Access to victim advocacy or legal assistance.
6. Extensions to deadlines or other class-related
adjustments or modifications of work or class schedules.
7. Campus safety escorts.
(3) Each school shall notify students, parents, school
100 staff, and school volunteers of the school's existing sexual
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1025-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1025 2026
101 violence policies and supportive measures by:
102 (a) Including such policies and measures in student,
103 parent, staff, or volunteer handbooks, catalogs, or other school
104 publications that list the rights, responsibilities, or
105 standards of conduct for students, school staff, and school
106 volunteers.
107 (b) Providing such policies and measures directly to
108 students, parents, school staff, and school volunteers using the
109 process by which such person has selected to receive
110 communications from the school.
111 1. A school shall provide such policies and measures to
112 students and parents at the student's time of enrollment or
113 registration, and each academic year thereafter within 30 days
114 of the first day of school.
115 2. A school shall provide such policies and measures to
116 school staff and school volunteers at the time such staff is
117 hired or when the volunteer begins his or her volunteer work.
118 The school shall require school staff and school volunteers to
119 annually review such policies and measure within 30 days of the
120 first of school.
121 (c) Placing a physical copy of such policies and measures
122 in a clearly visible location and public area of the school that
123 is readily accessible to and widely used by students and in a
124 location that is widely used by parents, school staff, and
125 school volunteers.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1025-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1025 2026
126 (d) Posting such policies and measures on the school's
127 website in a prominent location that is accessible from the
128 website's homepage by use of not more than three clicks. Such
129 policies and measures must also be published on the school
130 district's or governing body of the school's website in a
131 prominent location that is accessible from the website's
132 homepage by use of not more than three clicks.
133 (4) To provide notice to a student under the age of 18,
134 the school shall provide such notice to the student's parent.
135 However, a school may also provide notice to the student in an
136 age-appropriate or developmentally appropriate manner.
137 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1025-00